Odia_apertium_morph_dict.dix
<pardef n="ka/r__v">
<e><p><l>re</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ru</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ru</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ra</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ra</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ranwi</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>re</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ranwi</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ranwi</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruCi</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruci</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruCu</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruCu</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruCa</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruCa</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruCanwi</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruCi</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruci</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruCanwi</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruCanwi</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riCi</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riCu</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riCu</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riCa</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riCa</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riCanwi</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riCi</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riCanwi</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riCanwi</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>rili</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>li</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>rilu</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lu</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>rilu</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lu</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>rila</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>la</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>rila</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>la</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>rile</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>le</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>rilA</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lA</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>rile</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>le</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>rile</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>le</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruWili</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruWilu</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruWilu</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruWila</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruWila</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruWile</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruWilA</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruWile</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ruWile</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riWili</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riWilu</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riWilu</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riWila</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riWila</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riWile</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riWilA</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riWile</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riWile</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ribi</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ribu</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ribu</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riba</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riba</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ribe</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riba</l><r>r<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="kar"><i>ka</i><par n="ka/r__v"/></e>
<e lm="kar"><i>ka</i><par n="ka/r__v"/></e>
